Rhode Island statutes. Title 33 Probate Practice and Procedure
Chapter 21.1 Unclaimed Intangible and Tangible Property

33-21.1-1.
Definitions and use of terms.

As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Administrator” means the general treasurer or his or her designee, including agents hired for the express purpose of auditing, assessing and collecting unclaimed property.

“Apparent owner” means the person whose name appears on the records of the holder as the person entitled to property held, issued, or owing by the holder.

“Banking organization” means a bank, trust, company, savings bank (industrial bank, land bank, safe deposit company), private banker, or any organization defined by any of the laws of this or any other state as a bank or banking organization.

“Business association” means a public corporation, a non-public corporation, joint stock company, investment company, business trust, partnership, or association for business purposes of two (2) or more individuals, whether or not for profit, including a banking organization, financial organization, insurance company, or utility, but not including hospitals, private, nonprofit institutions of higher education, and other domestic charitable corporations as those terms are defined in this section.

“Domicile” means the state of incorporation of a corporation and the state of the principal place of business of an unincorporated person.

“Financial organization” means a savings and loan association, cooperative bank, building and loan association, or credit union.

“Hospital” means:

Any nonprofit hospital incorporated under the laws of the state, including any nonprofit subsidiary corporations formed by any hospital or formed by the parent corporation of a hospital, or

Any nonprofit corporation the member or members of which consist solely of one or more hospitals or parent corporations of hospitals, or

Any other hospital which is licensed as a general hospital or maternity hospital pursuant to chapter 17 of title 23 which is exempt from taxation.

“Holder” means a person, wherever organized or domiciled, who is:

In possession of property belonging to another,

A trustee, or

Indebted to another on an obligation.

“Insurance company” means an association, corporation, fraternal or mutual benefit organization, whether or not for profit, which is engaged in providing insurance coverage, including accident, burial, casualty, credit life, contract performance, dental, fidelity, fire, health, hospitalization, illness, life (including endowments and annuities), malpractice, marine, mortgage, surety, and wage protection insurance; but not including a nonprofit corporation organized pursuant to chapters 19, 20, 20.1, 20.2 and 20.3 of title 27.

“Intangible property” includes:

Money, checks, drafts, deposits, interest, dividends, income, and bonds;

Credit balances, customer overpayments, security deposits, refunds, credit memos, unpaid wages, unused airline tickets, unclaimed pari-mutuel tickets, and unidentified remittances;

Stocks and other intangible ownership interests in business associations;

Money deposited to redeem stocks, bonds, coupons, and other securities, or to make distributions;

Amounts due and payable under the terms of insurance policies; and

Amounts distributable from a trust or custodial fund established under a plan to provide health, welfare, pension, vacation, severance, retirement, death, stock purchase, profit sharing, employee savings, supplemental unemployment insurance, or similar benefits.

“Last known address” means a description of the location of the apparent owner sufficient for the purpose of the delivery of mail.

“Other domestic charitable corporation” means a corporation, except a hospital or private, nonprofit institution of higher education, as those terms are defined herein, organized and existing under chapter 6 of title 7, chapter 19 of title 27, or created by general or special act of the general assembly; provided however that domestic charitable corporations which qualify as charitable corporations under 26 U.S.C. § 501(c)(3) and have one hundred (100) or fewer employees shall be exempt from the provisions of this chapter.

“Owner” means a depositor in the case of a deposit, a beneficiary in the case of a trust other than a deposit in trust, a creditor, claimant, or payee in the case of other intangible property, or a person having a legal or equitable interest in property subject to this chapter or his or her legal representative.

“Person” means an individual, business association, state or other government, governmental subdivision or agency, public corporation, public authority, estate, trust, two (2) or more persons having a joint or common interest, or any other legal or commercial entity.

“Private, nonprofit institution of higher education” means an educational institution situated within this state which by virtue of law or charter is a private, nonprofit educational institution empowered to provide a program of education beyond the high school level and which is accredited by a nationally recognized educational accrediting agency or association and awards a bachelor’s or advance degree or provides a program of not less than two (2) years’ duration which is accepted for full credit toward a bachelor’s degree.

“State” means any state, district, commonwealth, territory, insular possession, or any other area subject to the legislative authority of the United States.

“Tangible property” includes all other property not defined as intangible property and which is not otherwise defined in this section.

“Utility” means a person who owns or operates for public use any plan, equipment, property, franchise, or license for the transmission of communications or the production, storage, transmission, sale, delivery, or furnishing of electricity, water, steam, or gas.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 500, § 3; P.L. 1987, ch. 139, § 1; P.L. 1989, ch. 223, § 1; P.L. 1993, ch. 9, § 2; P.L. 2005, ch. 194, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 202, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 73, art. 37, § 1.

33-21.1-2.
Property presumed abandoned.

Except as otherwise provided by this chapter, all intangible property, including any income or increment derived from intangible property, less any lawful charges, that is held, issued, or owing in the ordinary course of a holder’s business and has remained unclaimed by the owner for more than three (3) years after it became payable or distributable is presumed abandoned.

Property is payable or distributable for the purpose of this chapter notwithstanding the owner’s failure to make demand or to present any instrument or document required to receive payment.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 500, § 3; P.L. 1992, ch. 133, art. 86, § 2.

33-21.1-2.1.
United States savings bonds unclaimed property escheat procedure.

Notwithstanding the provisions of §

33-21.1-2(b)

, United States savings bonds that are unclaimed property and subject to the provisions of this chapter shall escheat to the state of Rhode Island three (3) years after becoming unclaimed property, and all property rights to such United States savings bonds or proceeds from such bonds shall vest solely in the state of Rhode Island.

If no claim has been filed pursuant to this chapter for United States savings bonds, the administrator may commence a civil action in any district court within the state of Rhode Island for a determination that such United States savings bonds shall escheat to the state. The administrator may postpone the bringing of such action until sufficient United States savings bonds have accumulated in the administrator’s custody to justify the expense of such proceedings.

If no person shall file a claim or appear at the hearing to substantiate a claim, or where the court shall determine that a claimant is not entitled to the property claimed by such claimant, then the court, if satisfied by evidence that the administrator has substantially complied with the laws of this state, shall enter a judgment that the subject United States savings bonds have escheated to the state.

The administrator may redeem such United States savings bonds escheated to the state and proceeds from such redemption of United States savings bonds shall be deposited in the state general fund in accordance with the provisions of §

33-21.1-23

.

History of Section.

P.L. 2016, ch. 386, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 406, § 1.

33-21.1-3.
General rules for taking custody of intangible unclaimed property.

Unless otherwise provided in this chapter or by other statute of this state, intangible property is subject to the custody of this state as unclaimed property if the conditions raising a presumption of abandonment under §§

33-21.1-2

and

33-21.1-5

—

33-21.1-16

are satisfied; and

The last known address, as shown on the records of the holder, of the apparent owner is in this state; or

The records of the holder do not reflect the identity of the person entitled to the property and it is established that the last known address of the person entitled to the property is in this state; or

The records of the holder do not reflect the last known address of the apparent owner, and it is established that:

The last known address of the person entitled to the property is in this state, or

The holder is a domiciliary or a government or governmental subdivision or agency of this state and has not previously paid or delivered the property to the state of the last known address of the apparent owner or other person entitled to the property; or

The last known address, as shown on the records of the holder, of the apparent owner is in a state that does not provide by law for the escheat or custodial taking of the property or its escheat or unclaimed property law is not applicable to the property and the holder is a domiciliary or a government or governmental subdivision or agency of this state; or

The last known address, as shown on the records of the holder, of the apparent owner is in a foreign nation and the holder is a domiciliary or a government or governmental subdivision or agency of this state; or

The transaction out of which the property arose occurred in this state, and

The last known address of the apparent owner or other person entitled to the property is unknown, or

The last known address of the apparent owner or other person entitled to the property is in a state that does not provide by law for the escheat or custodial taking of the property or its escheat or unclaimed property law is not applicable to the property, and

The holder is a domiciliary of a state that does not provide by law for the escheat or custodial taking of the property or its escheat or unclaimed property law is not applicable to the property.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 500, § 3.

33-21.1-3.1.
Property originated or issued by this state, any political subdivision of the state or any entity incorporated, organized, created or otherwise located in this state.

All intangible property, including, but not limited to securities, principal, interest, dividends, or other earnings thereon, less any lawful charges, held by a business association, federal, state or local government or governmental subdivision, agency or entity, or any other person or entity, regardless of where the holder may be found, if the owner has not claimed the property or corresponded in writing with the holder concerning the property within three (3) years after the date prescribed for payment or delivery by the issuer, unless the holder is a state that has taken custody pursuant to its own unclaimed property laws, in which case no additional period of holding beyond that of the state is necessary under this section, is presumed abandoned and subject to the custody of this state as unclaimed property if:

The last known address of the owner is unknown: and

The person or entity originating or issuing the intangible property is this state or any political subdivision of this state, or is incorporated, organized, created, or otherwise located in this state.

The provisions of subsection (a) shall not apply to property which is or may be presumed abandoned and subject to the custody of this state pursuant to any other section of this title or any other provision of law.

The provisions of subsection (a) shall apply to all property held at the time of enactment, or at any time thereafter, regardless of when the property became or becomes presumptively abandoned.

History of Section.

P.L. 1993, ch. 9, § 1.

33-21.1-4.
Travelers checks and money orders.

Subject to subsection (d), any sum payable on a travelers check that has been outstanding for more than fifteen (15) years after its issuance is presumed abandoned unless the owner, within fifteen (15) years, has communicated in writing with the issuer concerning it or otherwise indicated an interest as evidenced by a memorandum or other record on file prepared by an employee of the issuer.

Subject to subsection (d), any sum payable on a money order or similar written instrument, other than a third party bank check, that has been outstanding for more than five (5) years after its issuance is presumed abandoned unless the owner, within five (5) years, has communicated in writing with the issuer concerning it or otherwise indicated an interest as evidenced by a memorandum or other record on file prepared by an employee of the issuer.

A holder may not deduct from the amount of a travelers check or money order any charge imposed by reason of the failure to present the instrument for payment unless there is a valid and enforceable written contract between the issuer and the owner of the instrument pursuant to which the issuer may impose a charge and the issuer regularly imposes these charges and does not regularly reverse or otherwise cancel them.

No sum payable on a travelers check, money order, or similar written instrument, other than a third party bank check, described in subsections (a) and (b) may be subjected to the custody of this state as unclaimed property unless:

The records of the issuer show that the travelers check, money order, or similar written instrument was purchased in this state;

The issuer has its principal place of business in this state and the records of the issuer do not show the state in which the travelers check, money order, or similar written instrument was purchased; or

The issuer has its principal place of business in this state, the records of the issuer show the state in which the travelers check, money order, or similar written instrument was purchased and the laws of the state of purchase do not provide for the escheat or custodial taking of the property or its escheat or unclaimed property law is not applicable to the property.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, subsection (d) applies to sums payable on travelers checks, money orders, and similar written instruments presumed abandoned on or after February 1, 1971, except to the extent that those sums have been paid over to a state prior to January 1, 1981.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 500, § 3.

33-21.1-5.
Checks, drafts and similar instruments issued or certified by banking and financial organizations.

Any sum payable on a check, draft, or similar instrument, except those subject to §

33-21.1-4

, on which a banking or financial organization is directly liable, including a cashier’s check and a certified check, which has been outstanding for more than three (3) years after it was payable or after its issuance if payable on demand, is presumed abandoned, unless the owner, within three (3) years, has communicated in writing with the banking or financial organization concerning it or otherwise indicated an interest as evidenced by a memorandum or other record on file prepared by an employee thereof.

A holder may not deduct from the amount of any instrument subject to this section any charge imposed by reason of the failure to present the instrument for payment unless there is a valid and enforceable written contract between the holder and the owner of the instrument pursuant to which the holder may impose a charge, and the holder regularly imposes the charges and does not regularly reverse or otherwise cancel them.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 500, § 3; P.L. 1992, ch. 133, art. 86, § 2.

33-21.1-6.
Bank deposits and funds in financial organizations.

Any demand or savings deposit with a banking or financial organization, and any funds paid toward the purchase of a share, a mutual investment certificate, or any other interest in a banking or financial organization is presumed abandoned unless the owner, within three (3) years, and, in the case of matured time deposits, including a deposit that is automatically renewable, within six (6) years, has:

In the case of a deposit, increased or decreased its amount or presented the passbook or other similar evidence of the deposit for the crediting of interest;

Communicated in writing with the banking or financial organization concerning the property;

Otherwise indicated an interest in the property as evidenced by a memorandum or other record on file prepared by an employee of the banking or financial organization;

Owned other property to which subdivision (a)(1), (2), or (3) applies and if the banking or financial organization communicates in writing with the owner with regard to the property that would otherwise be presumed abandoned under this subsection at the address to which communications regarding the other property regularly are sent; or

Had another relationship with the banking or financial organization concerning which the owner has:

Communicated in writing with the banking or financial organization; or

Otherwise indicated an interest as evidenced by a memorandum or other record on file prepared by an employee of the banking or financial organization and if the banking or financial organization communicates in writing with the owner with regard to the property that would otherwise be abandoned under this subsection at the address to which communications regarding the other relationship regularly are sent.

For the purposes of subsection (a), property includes interest and dividends.

A holder may not impose with respect to property described in subsection (a) any charge due to dormancy or inactivity or cease payment of interest unless:

There is an enforceable written contract between the holder and the owner of the property pursuant to which the holder may impose a charge or cease payment of interest;

For property in excess of two dollars ($2.00), the holder, no more than three (3) months before the initial imposition of those charges or cessation of interest, has given written notice to the owner of the amount of those charges at the last known address of the owner stating that those charges will be imposed or that interest will cease, but the notice provided in this section need not be given with respect to charges imposed or interest ceased before July 1, 1987; and

The holder regularly imposes the charges or ceases payment of interest and does not regularly reverse or otherwise cancel them or retroactively credit interest with respect to the property.

Any property described in subsection (a) that is automatically renewable is matured for purposes of subsection (a) upon the expiration of its initial time period, but in the case of any renewal to which the owner consents at or about the time of renewal by communicating in writing with the banking or financial organization or otherwise indicating consent as evidenced by a memorandum or other record on file prepared by an employee of the organization, the property is matured upon the expiration of the last time period for which consent was given. If, at the time provided for delivery in §

33-21.1-19

, a penalty or forfeiture in the payment of interest would result from the delivery of the property, the time for delivery is extended until the time when no penalty or forfeiture would result.

In the event that any court appointed receiver of a banking or financial organization or a business organization referenced in Executive Order 91-2 (proclamation of January 1, 1991) sells, transfers or conveys any type of property referred to in this section to a banking or financial organization or business organization pursuant to court order, then notwithstanding any inactivity with respect to the property, all time periods referred to in this section shall commence upon the date of closing of the sale, transfer or conveyance.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 500, § 3; P.L. 1992, ch. 30, § 2; P.L. 1992, ch. 133, art. 86, § 2; P.L. 1993, ch. 48, § 1.

33-21.1-7.
Funds owing under life insurance policies.

Funds held or owing under any life or endowment insurance policy or annuity contract that has matured or terminated are presumed abandoned if unclaimed for more than three (3) years after the funds became due and payable as established from the records of the insurance company holding or owing the funds, but property described in subsection (c)(2) is presumed abandoned if unclaimed for more than two (2) years.

If a person other than the insured or annuitant is entitled to the funds and an address of the person is not known to the company or it is not definite and certain from the records of the company who is entitled to the funds, it is presumed that the last known address of the person entitled to the funds is the same as the last known address of the insured or annuitant according to the records of the company.

For purposes of this chapter, a life or endowment insurance policy or annuity contract not matured by actual proof of the death of the insured or annuitant according to the records of the company is matured and the proceeds due and payable, if:

The company has received due proof of death that the insured or annuitant has died; or

The insured has attained, or would have attained if he or she were living, the limiting age under the mortality table on which the reserve is based;

The policy was in force at the time the insured attained, or would have attained, the limiting age specified in subparagraph (i); and

Neither the insured nor any other person appearing to have an interest in the policy within the preceding two (2) years, according to the records of the company, has assigned, readjusted, or paid premiums on the policy, subjected the policy to a loan, corresponded in writing with the company concerning the policy, or otherwise indicated an interest as evidenced by a memorandum or other record on file prepared by an employee of the company.

For purposes of this chapter, the application of an automatic premium loan provision or other nonforfeiture provision contained in an insurance policy does not prevent a policy from being matured or terminated under subsection (a) if the insured has died or the insured or the beneficiary of the policy otherwise has become entitled to the proceeds of the deposit before the depletion of the cash surrender value of a policy by the application of those provisions.

If the laws of this state or the terms of the life insurance policy require the company to give notice to the insured or owner that an automatic premium loan provision or other nonforfeiture provision has been exercised and the notice, given to an insured or owner whose last known address according to the records of the company is in this state, is undeliverable, the company shall make a reasonable search to ascertain the policyholder’s correct address to which the notice must be mailed.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, if the company learns of the death of the insured or annuitant and the beneficiary has not communicated with the insurer within four (4) months after the death, the company shall take reasonable steps to pay the proceeds to the beneficiary.

Commencing two (2) years after July 1, 1987, every change of beneficiary form issued by an insurance company under any life or endowment insurance policy or annuity contract to an insured or owner who is a resident of this state must request the following information:

The name of each beneficiary, or if a class of beneficiaries is named, the name of each current beneficiary in the class;

The address of each beneficiary; and

The relationship of each beneficiary to the insured.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 500, § 3; P.L. 1992, ch. 133, art. 86, § 2.

33-21.1-8.
Deposits held by utilities.

A deposit, including any interest on the deposit, made by a subscriber with a utility to secure payment or any sum paid in advance for utility services to be furnished, less any lawful deductions, that remains unclaimed by the owner for more than one year after termination of the services for which the deposit or advance payment was made is presumed abandoned.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 500, § 3.

33-21.1-9.
Refunds held by business associations.

The sum to be paid as a refund, under an order or decision of a court or administrative agency or by agreement, remaining unclaimed for more than six (6) months after it became payable is presumed abandoned, regardless of whether the apparent owner has made any claim to the refund, unless, within the preceding six (6) months, there has been a communication between the apparent owner and the holder concerning that sum.

Any sum payable or intangible property properly distributable in the course of a voluntary or involuntary dissolution or liquidation remaining unclaimed for six (6) months after the date of the final distribution or liquidation is presumed abandoned, unless, within the preceding six (6) months, there has been communication between the apparent owner and the person making the payment or distribution concerning that sum or distribution.

Intangible property payable or distributable to a member of or participant in a class action, either one allowed by the court to be maintained as a class action or one essentially handled as a class action, and remaining for more than six (6) months after the time for the final payment or distribution is presumed abandoned, unless, within the preceding six (6) months, there has been a communication between the member or participant and the holder concerning the property. Intangible property payable or distributable as the result of litigation or settlement of a dispute before judicial or administrative body and remaining unclaimed for more than six (6) months after the time for the final payment or distribution is presumed abandoned, unless, within the preceding six (6) months, there has been a communication between the apparent owner and the holder concerning the property.

The person actually making or having the duty to make payment or distribution shall be deemed the holder for the purpose of this section.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 500, § 3; P.L. 1992, ch. 133, art. 86, § 2.

33-21.1-10.
Stock and other intangible interests in business associations.

Except as provided in subsections (b) and (e), stock or other intangible ownership interest in a business association, the existence of which is evidenced by records available to the association, is presumed abandoned and, with respect to the interest, the association is the holder, if a dividend, distribution, or other sum payable as a result of the interest has remained unclaimed by the owner for five (5) years and the owner within five (5) years has not:

Communicated in writing with the association regarding the interest or a dividend, distribution, or other sum payable as a result of the interest; or

Otherwise communicated with the association regarding the interest or a dividend, distribution, or other sum payable as a result of the interest, as evidenced by a memorandum or other record on file with the association prepared by an employee of the association.

At the expiration of a five (5) year period following the failure of the owner to claim a dividend, distribution, or other sum payable to the owner as a result of the interest, the interest is not presumed abandoned unless there have been at least five (5) dividends, distributions, or other sums paid during the period, none of which has been claimed by the owner. If five (5) dividends, distributions, or other sums are paid during the five (5) year period, the period leading to a presumption of abandonment commences on the date payment of the first unclaimed dividend, distribution, or other sum became due and payable. If five (5) dividends, distributions, or other sums are not paid during the presumptive period, the period continues to run until there have been five (5) dividends, distributions, or other sums that have not been claimed by the owner.

The running of the five (5) year period of abandonment ceases immediately upon the occurrence of a communication referred to in subsection (a). If any future dividend, distribution, or other sum payable to the owner as a result of the interest is subsequently not claimed by the owner, a new period of abandonment commences and relates back to the time a subsequent dividend, distribution, or other sum became due and payable.

At the time an interest is presumed abandoned under this section, any dividend distribution, or other sum then held for or owing to the owner as a result of the interest, and not previously presumed abandoned, is presumed abandoned.

This chapter does not apply to any stock or other intangible ownership interest enrolled in a plan that provides for the automatic reinvestment of dividends, distributions, or other sums payable as a result of the interest unless the records available to the administrator of the plan show, with respect to any intangible ownership interest not enrolled in the reinvestment plan, that the owner has not within five (5) years communicated in any manner described in subsection (a).

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 500, § 3.

33-21.1-11.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 500, § 3; Repealed by P.L. 1992, ch. 133, art. 86, § 3, effective July 1, 1992.

33-21.1-12.
Property held by agents and fiduciaries.

Intangible property and any income or increment derived from the intangible property held in a fiduciary capacity for the benefit of another person is presumed abandoned unless the owner, within three (3) years after it has become payable or distributable, has increased or decreased the principal, accepted payment of principal or income, communicated concerning the property, or otherwise indicated an interest as evidenced by a memorandum or other record on file prepared by the fiduciary. In applying the preceding sentence to family education accounts, as defined in §

44-30-25

, twenty (20) years shall be substituted for five (5) years.

Funds in an individual retirement account or a retirement plan for self employed individuals or similar account or plan established pursuant to the internal revenue laws of the United States are not payable or distributable within the meaning of subsection (a) unless, under the terms of the account or plan, distribution of all or part of the funds would then be mandatory.

For the purposes of this section, a person who holds property as an agent for a business association is deemed to hold the property in a fiduciary capacity for that business association alone, unless the agreement between him or her and the business association provides otherwise.

For the purposes of this chapter, a person who is deemed to hold property in a fiduciary capacity for a business association alone is the holder of the property only insofar as the interest of the business association in the property is concerned, and the business association is the holder of the property insofar as the interest of any other person in the property is concerned.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 500, § 3; P.L. 1989, ch. 220, § 2; P.L. 1992, ch. 133, art. 86, § 2.

33-21.1-13.
Property held by courts and public agencies.

Intangible property held for the owner by a court, state, or other government, governmental subdivision or agency, public corporation, or public authority which remains unclaimed by the owner for more than one year after becoming payable or distributable is presumed abandoned. Intangible property held by a state court shall escheat to the state pursuant to the provisions of §

8-12-1

— §

8-12-3

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 500, § 3; P.L. 2010, ch. 231, § 4; P.L. 2010, ch. 238, § 4.

33-21.1-14.
Gift certificates and credit memos.

A credit memo issued by a business association that remains unredeemed for more than three (3) years after issuance is presumed abandoned. Pursuant to §

6-13-12

, gift certificates shall not be presumed to be abandoned.

In the case of a credit memo, the amount presumed abandoned is the amount credited as shown in the memo itself.

The amount of a credit memo presumed abandoned is subject to the custody of this state in the following circumstances:

The records of the issuer show that the last known address of the recipient of the memo is in this state;

The records of the issuer do not show the address of the purchaser or recipient, but do show that the certificate or memo was issued in this state;

The records of the issuer do not show the address of the recipient and do not show the state where the memo was issued and the issuer has its principal place of business in this state;

The records of the issuer show that the address of the recipient, or if none, the state where the memo was issued, is in or is a state whose escheat or unclaimed property law does provide for the escheat or custodial taking of credit memos, and the issuer has its principal place of business in this state.

Commencing on July 1, 1992, a business association issuing a credit memo in this state shall have a duty to record either the name and address of a recipient of a credit memo or the state in which the memo was issued.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 500, § 3; P.L. 1992, ch. 133, art. 86, § 2; P.L. 2005, ch. 194, § 2; P.L. 2005, ch. 202, § 2.

33-21.1-14.1.
Property held by police departments.

All tangible and intangible personal property and any income from this property which has been confiscated by any city, town, or state police department and has been held in the custody of the department for six (6) months or more shall be presumed abandoned and shall revert to the general fund in accordance with §

33-21.1-23

.

All money which is being held by the police department as a result of confiscation shall be deposited in a special interest bearing bank account during and until the expiration of the three (3) year period prior to reversion to the general fund.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 500, § 3; P.L. 1992, ch. 133, art. 86, § 2; P.L. 1997, ch. 30, art. 28, § 9.

33-21.1-14.2.
Property held by hospitals, private, nonprofit institution of higher education or other domestic charitable corporations.

All intangible property in the form of uncashed vendor checks which have been held in the custody of a hospital, private, nonprofit institutions of higher education or such other domestic charitable corporations for three (3) or more years and satisfies the conditions found in §

33-21.1-3(1)

through (6) shall be presumed abandoned.

History of Section.

P.L. 1989, ch. 223, § 2; P.L. 1992, ch. 133, art. 86, § 2.

33-21.1-15.
Wages.

Unpaid wages, including wages represented by unpresented payroll checks, owing in the ordinary course of the holder’s business which remain unclaimed by the owner for more than one year after becoming payable are presumed abandoned. In addition, unpaid wages, including wages represented by unpresented payroll checks, owing in the ordinary course of the business of a hospital, private, nonprofit institution of higher education, and other domestic charitable corporation which remain unclaimed by the owner for more than one year after becoming payable are presumed abandoned.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 500, § 3; P.L. 1989, ch. 223, § 3.

33-21.1-16.
Contents of safe deposit box or other safekeeping repository.

All tangible and intangible property held in a safe deposit box or any other safekeeping repository in this state in the ordinary course of the holder’s business, and proceeds resulting from the sale of the property permitted by other law, which remain unclaimed by the owner for more than three (3) years after the lease or rental period on the box or other repository has expired, are presumed abandoned.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 500, § 3; P.L. 1992, ch. 133, art. 86, § 2.

33-21.1-16.1.
Unclaimed demutualization proceeds.

Property distributable in the course of a demutualization of an insurance company is deemed abandoned two (2) years after the date the property is first distributable if, at the time of the first distribution the last known address of the owner on the books and records of the holder is known to be incorrect, or the distribution or statements are returned by the post office as undeliverable; and the owner has not:

Communicated in writing with the holder or its agents regarding the property; or

Otherwise communicated with the holder regarding the property as evidenced by a memorandum or other record on file with the holder or its agent.

History of Section.

P.L. 2003, ch. 376, art. 33, § 1.